Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.400.322

Crimes against children—Crimes specified.

(1) RCW 28A.400.320, 28A.400.330, 28A.405.470, * 28A.410.090(3), 28A.410.110, 9.96A.020, and 43.43.845 apply upon a guilty plea or conviction occurring after July 23, 1989, and before July 26, 2009, for any of the following felony crimes:

(a) Any felony crime involving the physical neglect of a child under chapter 9A.42 RCW;

(b) The physical injury or death of a child under chapter 9A.32 or 9A.36 RCW, except motor vehicle violations under chapter 46.61 RCW;

(c) Sexual exploitation of a child under chapter 9.68A RCW;

(d) Sexual offenses under chapter 9A.44 RCW where a minor is the victim;

(e) Promoting prostitution of a minor under chapter 9A.88 RCW;

(f) The sale or purchase of a minor child under RCW 9A.64.030;

(g) Violation of laws of another jurisdiction that are similar to those specified in (a) through (f) of this subsection.

(2) RCW 28A.400.320, 28A.400.330, 28A.405.470, * 28A.410.090(3), 28A.410.110, 9.96A.020, and 43.43.845 apply upon a guilty plea or conviction occurring on or after July 26, 2009, for any of the following felony crimes or attempts, conspiracies, or solicitations to commit any of the following felony crimes:

(a) A felony violation of RCW 9A.88.010, indecent exposure;

(b) A felony violation of chapter 9A.42 RCW involving physical neglect;

(c) A felony violation of chapter 9A.32 RCW;

(d) A violation of RCW 9A.36.011, assault 1; 9A.36.021, assault 2; 9A.36.120, assault of a child 1; 9A.36.130, assault of a child 2; or any other felony violation of chapter 9A.36 RCW involving physical injury except assault 3 where the victim is eighteen years of age or older;

(e) A sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;

(f) A violation of RCW 9A.40.020, kidnapping 1; or 9A.40.030, kidnapping 2;

(g) A violation of RCW 9A.64.030, child selling or child buying;

(h) A violation of RCW 9A.88.070, promoting prostitution 1;

(i) A violation of RCW 9A.56.200, robbery 1; or

(j) A violation of laws of another jurisdiction that are similar to those specified in (a) through (i) of this subsection.

[ 2009 c 396 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.410.090 was amended by 2013 c 163 s 1, changing subsection (3) to subsection (4).